Utah statutes.
41-6a-1110.   Bicycle and moped inspections -- At request of officer.

A peace officer may at any time require a person riding a bicycle or moped to stop and submit the bicycle or moped to an inspection and a test as appropriate if the officer has reasonable cause to believe that:

(1)  the bicycle or moped is unsafe or not equipped as required by law; or

(2)  the bicycle or moped's equipment is not in proper adjustment or repair.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

